Massachusetts, session 194th, S710.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 11A of chapter 13, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is
hereby amended by striking out the first paragraph and inserting in place thereof the following
paragraph:-
There shall be a board of allied health professions, hereinafter called the board, which
shall consist of 15 members who are residents of the commonwealth to be appointed by the
governor. Three of such members shall be qualified athletic trainers licensed in accordance with
section 23B of chapter 112; 2 of such members shall be occupational therapists licensed in
accordance with said section 23B; 1 such member shall be an occupational therapy assistant
licensed in accordance with said section 23B; 2 of such members shall be physical therapists
licensed in accordance with said section 23B; 1 such member shall be a physical therapist
of 4

assistant licensed in accordance with said section 23B; 1 of such member shall be an
electrologist licensed in accordance with said section 23B; 1 of such member shall be a physician
licensed in accordance with section 2 of chapter 112; and 1 such member shall be selected from
and shall represent the general public.
SECTION 2. Said section 11A of said chapter 13, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by striking out the words “or physical therapy”, in lines 51 and 52, and inserting in
place thereof the following words:- physical therapy or electrolysis.
SECTION 3. Section 23B of said chapter 112, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
striking out, in line 8, the words “and physical therapist assistants” and inserting in place thereof
the following words:- , physical therapist assistants and licensed electrologists.
SECTION 4. The first paragraph of said section 23B of said chapter 112, as so appearing,
is hereby amended by striking out the fourth sentence and inserting in place thereof the following
sentence:- An applicant who furnishes satisfactory proof that they are of good moral character
and that they have met the educational and clinical practice requirements set forth in section 23F,
23G, 23H, 23I, 23J or 23J½, shall, upon payment of a fee determined by the secretary of
administration and finance, be examined by the board, and if found qualified, and if the applicant
passes the examination, shall be licensed to practice.
SECTION 5. Section 23C of said chapter 112, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
inserting after the word “assistant”, in line 4, the following words:- or licensed electrologist.
SECTION 6. Said section 23C of said chapter 112, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by inserting after the word “chapter”, in line 11, the following words:- ; as a licensed
electrologist.
of 4

SECTION 7. Section 23D of said chapter 112, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
inserting after the words “physical therapist assistant”, in line 3, the following words:- , or a
licensed electrologist.
SECTION 8. Section 23E of said chapter 112, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
inserting after the word “assistant”, in line 8, the following words:- or licensed electrologist.
SECTION 9. Said section 23E of said chapter 112, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by inserting after the word “therapy”, in line 14, the following words:- or electrolysis.
SECTION 10. Said section 23E of said chapter 112, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by inserting after the words “physical therapy services”, in line 21, the following
words:- or electrolysis.
SECTION 11. Said section 23E of said chapter 112, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by inserting after the words “physical therapist”, in line 24, the following words:- or
licensed electrologist.
SECTION 12. Said chapter 112 is hereby further amended by inserting after section 23J
the following section:-
Section 23J½. An applicant for licensure as an electrologist shall:
(i) be at least 18 years of age;
(ii) have submitted a completed application upon a form and in such manner as the board
prescribes, accompanied by applicable fees;
of 4

(iii) have met the education and clinical standards established for licensed electrologists
by the Massachusetts Association of Electrologists and have passed an examination adopted or
administered by the board; and
(iv) have completed such other requirements as may be prescribed by the board.
SECTION 13. Section 23K of said chapter 112, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
inserting after the words “physical therapy”, in line 9, the following words:- , or electrolysis.
SECTION 14. Section 23L of said chapter 112, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
striking out, in line 3, the words “or physical therapist assistant” and inserting in place thereof
the following words:- physical therapist assistant, or licensed electrologist."
of 4